Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1222.
do enact as follows:AB1222,11Section 1. 15.105 (34) of the statutes is created to read:AB1222,2,7215.105 (34) Office of the ombudsperson for corrections. There is 3created an office of the ombudsperson for corrections, attached to the department of 4administration under s. 15.03. The office shall be under the direction and 5supervision of an ombudsperson who shall be nominated by the governor, and, with 6the advice and consent of the senate appointed, shall serve at the pleasure of the 7governor. AB1222,28Section 2. 16.035 of the statutes is created to read:AB1222,2,9916.035 Office of the ombudsperson for corrections. (1) In this section:AB1222,2,1110(a) “Ombudsperson” means the ombudsperson of the office of the 11ombudsperson for corrections.AB1222,2,1412(b) “Prisoner” means a prisoner who is imprisoned in a state facility or who is 13under the supervision of a community-based correctional service contracted for or 14operated by the department of corrections.AB1222,2,1615(c) “State facility” means a state prison, a juvenile correctional facility, or a 16secured residential care center for children and youth.AB1222,3,41(2) The ombudsperson may appoint, in the classified service, one deputy 2ombudsperson of the office of the ombudsperson of corrections. The ombudsperson 3may delegate to the deputy ombudsperson any of the ombudsperson’s authority or 4duties except those described under sub. (12).AB1222,3,65(3) The ombudsperson shall investigate complaints regarding all of the 6following:AB1222,3,77(a) A state facility.AB1222,3,98(b) A community-based correctional service contracted for or operated by the 9department of corrections.AB1222,3,1010(c) Abuse, unfair acts, and violations of rights of prisoners. AB1222,3,1211(4) The ombudsperson may investigate complaints under sub. (3) (a), (b), or (c) 12from all of the following, at no cost to the complainant:AB1222,3,1613(a) Prisoners, staff, and contractors at state facilities and community-based 14correctional services contracted for or operated by the department of corrections. 15Prisoners, staff, and contractors shall first exhaust any internal complaint 16processes before filing a complaint with the ombudsperson.AB1222,3,1717(b) Family members of prisoners and members of the community.AB1222,4,518(5) The ombudsperson shall create a complaint form and provide sufficient 19blank copies of the form and self-sealing envelopes to state agencies that operate 20state facilities for distribution to prisoners at the request of a prisoner and to 21operators of community-based correctional services contracted for or operated by 22the department of corrections. The blank copies of the form and self-sealing 23envelopes shall also be placed in locations that prisoners regularly visit, such as a 24common area or library, for prisoners to use. The department shall also make the 1form available on its website. Staff of the office of the ombudsperson for corrections 2shall regularly visit each state facility in each correctional region of this state to 3collect completed forms in sealed envelopes. No individual other than an employee 4of the office of the ombudsperson for corrections is authorized to open an envelope 5that contains a complaint form.AB1222,4,126(6) The ombudsperson shall review each complaint under sub. (3) and 7determine whether the office of the ombudsperson for corrections will make a 8recommendation regarding the complaint directly to the operator of the state 9facility where the prisoner is housed, the operator of the community-based 10correctional service, the governor, or the legislature, or other party, or make no 11recommendation. No individual other than the addressee is authorized to open an 12envelope that contains a response from the ombudsperson.AB1222,4,1813(7) If the ombudsperson determines, as provided in sub. (6), to make a 14recommendation directly to the operator of the state facility where the prisoner is 15housed or the operator of the community-based correctional service, the operator 16shall respond within 30 days. The operator shall include in the response what 17actions the operator is taking as a result of the recommendations of the 18ombudsperson and why the operator is taking those actions or not taking actions. AB1222,4,2019(8) The ombudsperson may investigate the policies and practices of any or the 20following:AB1222,4,2121(a) A state agency that operates a state facility.AB1222,4,2222(b) A state facility.AB1222,4,2423(c) A community-based correctional service contracted for or operated by the 24department of corrections.AB1222,5,71(9) The ombudsperson shall annually publish reports of the ombudsperson’s 2findings and recommendations for improvements to policies and practices of 3community-based correctional services contracted for or operated by the 4department of corrections and state facilities. The ombudsperson shall maintain a 5public website that is updated monthly and that contains a dashboard of statistics 6regarding complaints received by the ombudsperson, including at least all of the 7following information:AB1222,5,88(a) Number.AB1222,5,99(b) Type.AB1222,5,1010(c) Resolution.AB1222,5,1111(d) Implementation of any recommendations.AB1222,5,1712(10) The operator of a state facility or a community-based correctional service 13shall cooperate with the ombudsperson and shall make its facilities and records 14regarding prisoners available to the ombudsperson as reasonably necessary for the 15ombudsperson to conduct investigations of complaints and to conduct investigations 16of practices of the operator and any facilities operated by the operator. The operator 17may not unreasonably restrict access to records regarding prisoners. AB1222,5,2118(11) The ombudsperson may subpoena witnesses and the production of books, 19papers, records, and documents material to an investigation conducted by the 20ombudsperson or a staff member of the office of the ombudsperson for corrections, 21including any electronic media and video and audio recordings.AB1222,5,2422(12) If the ombudsperson has reason to believe that any public official or 23employee has acted in a manner warranting criminal or disciplinary proceedings, 24the ombudsperson may refer the matter to the appropriate authorities.AB1222,6,71(13) On or before December 31 each year, the ombudsperson shall submit to 2the governor, the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution to the 3legislature under s. 13.172 (2), and the secretary of the department of corrections a 4report of the ombudsperson’s findings and results of the ombudsperson’s 5investigations under this section. The report shall include any responses provided 6by the operator of a state facility or the operator of a community-based correctional 7service under sub. (7).AB1222,38Section 3. 20.505 (1) (dz) of the statutes is created to read:AB1222,6,11920.505 (1) (dz) Office of the ombudsperson for corrections; general program 10operations. A sum sufficient for the operation of the office of the ombudsperson for 11corrections under s. 16.035.AB1222,412Section 4. 20.923 (6) (ak) of the statutes is created to read:AB1222,6,141320.923 (6) (ak) Administration, department of: ombudsperson of the office of 14the ombudsperson for corrections.AB1222,515Section 5. 230.08 (2) (ym) of the statutes is created to read:AB1222,6,1716230.08 (2) (ym) The ombudsperson of the office of the ombudsperson for 17corrections.AB1222,618Section 6. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1222,6,2219(1) Position authorizations. The authorized FTE positions for the 20department of administration are increased by 26.0 GPR positions, to be funded 21from the appropriation under s. 20.505 (1) (dz), for the purpose of operating the 22office of the ombudsperson for corrections.AB1222,6,2323